Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 4. Chief Engineer

§ 2671.
Duties generally.

The chief engineer, or, in his or her absence, the assistants in the order of their rank, under the supervision of the prudential committee, shall have charge of the apparatus for the prevention and extinguishment of fires, and shall keep the same in serviceable order.
When on duty, an engineer shall wear conspicuously a badge of office with his or her rank inscribed thereon.

§ 2672.
Enforcement of bylaws; alteration and repair of fireplaces, furnaces, and stoves.

The chief engineer may carry into effect any bylaw or rule of the district and may direct alterations in the position and repairs of fireplaces, furnaces, stoves, and other things from which damage from fire is apprehended. If the directions are not complied with promptly, he or she may cause the change or repairs to be made and recover the expense of the change or repairs, with costs, from the owner or possessor in a civil action in the name of the district.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 168.

§ 2673.
Powers and duties during hazardous chemical or substance incident, fires; threat of fires or explosions.

The chief engineer, or in the chief’s absence, the assistant highest in rank present at a hazardous chemical or substance incident or fire, shall have charge of the fire apparatus and of the companies and persons attending the hazardous chemical or substance incident or fire for the purpose of containing, controlling, or extinguishing the same and may remove goods and effects out of a building or place endangered by the hazardous chemical or substance incident or fire. The chief engineer may cause to be pulled down or removed such buildings as the chief deems necessary to prevent the spread of hazardous material or fire and for such purposes may require the assistance of inhabitants of the district. During the hazardous chemical or substance incident or fire, the chief engineer may suppress tumults or disorders and direct the labor of inhabitants present in such fire district.

Where an emergency situation exists in a municipality and there is no fire, but there is an imminent threat of a hazardous chemical or substance incident, fire, or explosion, the ranking member of the fire company responding will be in charge as long as the imminent threat continues. Where there is a threat of bombing, the fire department shall surrender responsibility to the police department having jurisdiction in the area.

The ranking member of a fire department shall have authority to direct, control, and supervise traffic at the scene of a fire or other emergency to which a fire department has responded.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 52

, § 1;

1975, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 7, 1976;

1991, No. 29

, § 1;

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 14, 1994;

2009, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 26(8)(A).

§ 2674.
Assistance outside district.

When a fire occurs in a fire district or town and application for assistance is made to an officer or inhabitant of another organized fire district by an officer or inhabitant of such district or town, if in his or her judgment assistance should be granted, the chief engineer may designate the engine and company to render such assistance.

§ 2675.
Penalties for disobedience of order or bylaw.

A person who refuses to obey a lawful order or direction of an engineer or the official highest in rank present at a fire or other emergency or disobeys a bylaw of the district shall be fined not more than $250.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 52

, § 2;

1991, No. 29

, § 2.